Colorado statutes. TITLE 43 Transportation
PART 14
DESIGN-BUILD CONTRACTS

Law reviews:

For article, "Design-Build

C

ontracts for

C

olorado Highway Construction: New Contractual Issues--Part I", see 29 Colo. Law. 49 (Feb. 2000); for article, "Design-Build Contracts for Colorado Highway Construction: New Contractual Issues--Part II", see 29 Colo. Law. 53 (March 2000).

43-1-1401. Legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The increased population growth and economic activity within the state has resulted in the significant and growing demand for increased construction and reconstruction of highways and other transportation projects within the state to facilitate the movement of people, goods, and information;

As a result of the increased federal and state funding provided to the department of transportation in recent years for transportation projects, together with the increasing number, size, and complexity of planned transportation projects, the department will benefit from the use of a faster, more efficient, and more cost-effective contractor selection and procurement process to design and construct transportation projects;

A design-build selection and procurement process will provide the department of transportation with: A savings of time, cost, and administrative burden; improved quality expectations with respect to the schedule and budget of transportation projects, as well as completion of such projects; and a reduction in the risks associated with transportation projects, including reduced duplication of expenses and improved coordination of efforts to meet the transportation needs of Colorado.

The general assembly intends that this part 14 authorize the department of transportation to enter design-build contracts and to use an adjusted score design-build selection and procurement process for particular transportation projects regardless of the minimum or maximum cost of such projects, based on the individual needs and merits of such projects, and subject to approval by the transportation commission. The general assembly also intends that the department's use of an adjusted score design-build contract process shall not prohibit use of the low bid process currently used by the department pursuant to part 1 of article 92 of title 24 and part 14 of article 30 of title 24, C.R.S.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 256, § 1, effective April 9.

43-1-1402. Definitions.

As used in this part 14:

"Adjusted score design-build contract process" means a process to award contracts based on the lowest adjusted score of proposals submitted to the department.

"Best value" means the overall maximum value of a proposal to the department after considering all of the evaluation factors described in the specifications for the transportation project or the request for proposals, including but not limited to the time needed for performance of the contract, innovative design approaches, the scope and quality of the work, work management, aesthetics, project control, and the total cost of the transportation project.

"Design-build contract" means the procurement of both the design and the construction of a transportation project in a single contract with a single design-build firm or a combination of such firms that are capable of providing the necessary design and construction services. A design-build contract may also include in the contract the procurement of the financing, operation, or maintenance of the project.

"Design-build firm" means any company, firm, partnership, corporation, association, joint venture, or other entity permitted by law to practice engineering, architecture, or construction contracting in the state of Colorado.

(4.5) "Force majeure" means fire, explosion, action of the elements, strike, interruption of transportation, rationing, shortage of labor, equipment, or materials, court action, illegality, unusually severe weather, act of God, act of war, or any other cause that is beyond the control of the party performing work on a design-build transportation or utility relocation project and that could not have been prevented by the party while exercising reasonable diligence.

(4.7) "Project specific utility relocation agreement" means an agreement entered into by the department and a utility company for the purpose of performing utility relocation work necessitated by a design-build transportation project. The agreement may incorporate reasonable and appropriate conditions, including, but not limited to, conditions for ensuring:

The prompt performance of utility relocation work by either the utility company or the contractor for the design-build transportation project, as specified in the agreement;

The cooperation of the utility company with the contractor for the design-build transportation project;

The timely repayment of any funds advanced to the utility company for the relocation construction, including interest based on the costs incurred by the department for advancing the funds; and

The payment by the utility company of any damages caused by the company's delay in the performance of the relocation work or interference with the performance of the project by any other contractor, except when such delay or interference is caused by a force majeure.

"Transportation project" means any project that the department is authorized by law to undertake including but not limited to a highway, tollway, bridge, mass transit, intelligent transportation system, traffic management, traveler information services, or any other project for transportation purposes.

"Utility company" or "utility" shall have the same meaning as set forth in 23 CFR 645.105.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 257, § 1, effective April 9.

L. 2000:

(4.5), (4.7), and (6) added, p. 1610, § 1, effective June 1.

L. 2007:

(6) amended, p. 2050, § 103, effective June 1.

L. 2009:

(3) amended, (SB 09-108), ch. 5, p. 55, § 17, effective March 2.

43-1-1403. Authority to use a design-build contract process.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the department may select a design-build firm and award a design-build contract for a transportation project as provided in this part 14. The department may include a warranty provision in any design-build contract that requires the design-build firm to perform maintenance services on the completed transportation project.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 258, § 1, effective April 9.

43-1-1404. Criteria.

The department may use a design-build contract for a transportation project if the design work for such project must be performed before a potential bidder can develop a price or cost proposal for such project and if the chief engineer of the engineering, design, and construction division determines that using a design-build contract is appropriate. The chief engineer shall consider the following factors in making a determination pursuant to this subsection (1):

The extent to which the transportation project requirements are adequately defined;

The time constraints for completing the transportation project;

The capability and experience of potential design-build firms;

The suitability of the transportation project to a design-build contract; and

The capability of the department to manage the design-build contract.

The department may use a design-build contract regardless of the estimated minimum or maximum cost of a transportation project.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 258, § 1, effective April 9.

43-1-1405. Public notice procedures.

At least forty-five days prior to the anticipated date of selecting a design-build firm for a transportation project, the department shall publish a public notice at least twice in one or more daily newspapers of general circulation in the state. The public notice shall set forth a general description of the transportation project.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 258, § 1, effective April 9.

43-1-1406. General procedures.

The department shall describe in the specifications for the transportation project the particular design-build contract and selection procedures to be used in awarding such contract, including but are not limited to the following:

A scope of work statement that defines the transportation project and provides prospective design-build firms with sufficient information regarding the department's requirements for the transportation project;

If the department uses an adjusted score design-build contract process to select a design-build firm, a scope of work statement that is flexible and that identifies the end result that the department wants to achieve. The department may determine the adjustment factors and methods it will use to adjust scores and shall state such factors and methods in the specifications for the transportation project. The department may also provide a general concept of the transportation project to potential design-build firms. Adjusted score design-build procedures shall consist of the following two phases:

In the first phase, the department shall issue a request for qualifications within the time specified in section 43-1-1405 to solicit proposals that include information on the design-build firm's qualifications and its technical approach to the proposed transportation project. The department shall include appropriate evaluation factors in the request for qualifications, including the factors set forth in section 24-30-1403 (2), C.R.S. The department shall not include cost-related or price-related factors in the request for qualifications. In accordance with the time requirements specified in the department's rules, the department shall develop a short list of the highest qualified design-build firms from the proposals submitted in response to the request for qualifications.

In the second phase, the department shall issue a request for proposals to the design-build firms included on the short list developed pursuant to subparagraph (I) of this paragraph (b) in accordance with the time requirements specified in the department's rules. The request for proposals shall include:

A request to separately submit a sealed technical proposal and a sealed cost proposal for the transportation project;

The required content of the technical proposal to be submitted by the design-build firm, including design concepts for the transportation project, the proposed solutions to the requirements addressed in the department's scope of work statement, or both;

Any other evaluation factors the department considers appropriate, including the estimated cost of the transportation project; and

Any formula the department determines is appropriate to adjust the total score of a design-build firm's proposal.

Except as provided in this subsection (2), the department shall allow the preference to Colorado residents provided in section 24-103-908 in awarding an adjusted score design-build contract pursuant to this part 14. In evaluating and selecting a proposal for a design-build contract under this part 14, the department shall assign greater value to a proposal in proportion to the extent such proposal commits to using Colorado residents to perform work on the transportation project. If, however, the department determines that compliance with this subsection (2) may cause the denial of federal moneys that would otherwise be available for the transportation project or if such compliance would otherwise be inconsistent with the requirements of federal law, the department shall suspend the preference granted under this subsection (2) only to the extent necessary to prevent denial of federal moneys or to eliminate the inconsistency with federal law.

The department may use any basis for awarding a design-build contract pursuant to this part 14 that it deems appropriate so long as the basis for awarding such contract is adequately described in the specifications for the transportation project or the request for proposals. Such basis may include awarding a contract to the design-build firm whose proposal provides the best value to the department.

The department may cancel any request for qualifications, request for proposals, or other solicitation issued pursuant to this part 14 or may reject any or all proposals in whole or in part when the department determines that such cancellation or rejection is in the best interest of the department.

If the department awards a design-build contract pursuant to this part 14, the department shall execute a design-build contract with the successful design-build firm and shall give notice to said firm to commence work on the transportation project.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 258, § 1, effective April 9.

L. 2017:

(2) amended, (HB 17-1051), ch. 99, p. 353, § 75, effective August 9.

43-1-1407. Stipulated fee.

At its discretion, the department may award a stipulated fee to the design-build firms that submit responsive proposals but that are not awarded the design-build contract for a transportation project. The department shall not be required to award such stipulated fee, but if it elects to award such fee for a transportation project, the department shall identify the availability and the amount of such fee in its request for proposals.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 260, § 1, effective April 9.

43-1-1408. Commission approval required.

The department shall obtain approval from the transportation commission prior to using an adjusted score design-build contract process for any transportation project.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 260, § 1, effective April 9.

43-1-1409. Rule-making authority.

The department may adopt rules in accordance with sections 43-1-110 and 24-4-103, C.R.S., to:

Establish requirements for the procurement of design-build contracts that it determines necessary or appropriate, including but not limited to rules implementing the design-build selection and contract procedures, subcontracting, and the warranty provisions of this part 14; and

Further define and implement the processes and procedures for the performance of utility relocation work necessitated by a design-build transportation project, including, but not limited to, the allocation of responsibility for damages due to delay among the department, the design-build contractor, and utility companies that do not enter into project specific utility relocation agreements, and the creation of a forum and process to resolve changes in the conditions of the design-build transportation project that impact utility relocation work when the department and a utility company have not entered into a project specific utility relocation agreement.

Source:

L. 99:

Entire part added, p. 260, § 1, effective April 9.

L. 2000:

Entire section amended, p. 1611, § 2, effective June 1.

43-1-1410. Utility relocation - legislative declaration.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The department is authorized by law to use a design-build process for transportation projects that allows for the improved coordination, scheduling, and timely performance of transportation projects, resulting in time and cost efficiency;

The scheduling and timely performance of design-build transportation projects partially depend upon the coordination with utility companies for the prompt performance of utility relocation work necessitated by the project;

Increased coordination between the department and utility companies is in the public interest and the encouragement and requirement of prompt performance of utility relocation work within the design-build transportation project performance schedule will reduce delays and costs of the projects;

The preferred approach for utility relocation work in a design-build transportation project is for the utility company to authorize the department's design-build contractor to engage the services of the utility company's prequalified contractors for the design and construction of the relocation work because it places the responsibility for the timely performance of the utility relocation work on the design-build contractor and removes the risk of utility relocation delays from multiple utility companies;

Current law limits the department's authority in relation to payment for utility relocation, and nothing in this part 14 is intended to alter the department's obligation to pay for utility relocations pursuant to section 43-1-225 or to pay for utility relocations when utility facilities are located on easements owned by the utility;

Allowing the department to fund the design of the utility relocation work necessitated by a design-build transportation project will foster the coordination of the utility relocation work, which is in the public interest;

In the interest of the public, the department, the design-build contractor, and the utility company should coordinate their efforts, perform the utility relocation work in accordance with the design-build transportation project performance schedule, and allocate the responsibility for any damages caused by a party's failure to timely perform the relocation work, except when such failure is due to a force majeure;

The review and approval of the utility company of any design work prior to the commencement of any utility relocation construction in relation to a design-build transportation project will assure that such work meets the quality standards and construction methods of the utility company. The department also recognizes the obligation of utility companies to maintain service to their customers, and the department agrees to work within utility company terms and conditions to maintain service continuity.

For purposes of design-build transportation projects, allowing the department to provide and condemn, when necessary, a replacement easement for a utility company to relocate its facilities when the utility company's facilities are located in an easement owned by the utility company and to pay for the future relocation of a utility company's facilities if no replacement easement is provided is in the public interest.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1611, § 3, effective June 1.

43-1-1411. Project specific utility relocation agreements.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if a utility company enters into a project specific utility relocation agreement with the department, the department may:

Pay for the performance of the design work to relocate a utility company's facilities that are affected by the scope of the design-build transportation project;

Advance funds for the performance of the construction work to relocate a utility company's facilities affected by the scope of the design-build transportation project; except that any advance of funds pursuant to this paragraph (b) shall be subject to full repayment by the utility company with interest based on the cost incurred by the department for advancing the funds; and

Perform any utility relocation work through the contractor for the design-build transportation project in accordance with the utility company's specifications for the relocation work and subject to the utility company's prior review and written approval of the relocation work to assure that the work meets the quality standards and construction methods of the company. The performance of any relocation work shall also be subject to inspection and approval by the utility company, during the performance of the work and prior to completion of the relocation work, and the department shall take appropriate measures to ensure service continuity.

It is the intent of the general assembly that the department work with the utility company to come to a mutually satisfactory agreement with the utility company so that the design-build transportation project may proceed to be constructed in an efficient manner without causing interruption of utility services. If the utility company is unable to reach a project specific utility relocation agreement with the project manager negotiating such agreement for the department, the utility company shall be provided the opportunity to address its concerns with the department's district engineer, who shall give due consideration to all issues raised by the utility company and shall strive to accommodate reasonable modifications requested by the utility company to the department's proposed project specific utility relocation agreement. If an agreement cannot be reached between the district engineer and the utility company, the executive director of the department shall review the disputed issues and seek to resolve the dispute. If the executive director is unable to reach agreement with the utility company, the executive director shall prepare a written report setting forth the reasons that the dispute could not be resolved and shall provide such report to the utility company within three business days.

For any utility company that chooses not to enter into a project specific utility relocation agreement with the department for the performance of utility relocation work:

The department may direct the utility company to perform or allow the performance of the utility relocation work within the performance schedule for the design-build transportation project;

The utility company shall pay for damages caused by the company's delay in the performance of the utility relocation work or interference with the performance of the design-build transportation project by other contractors, including, but not limited to, payments made by the department to any third party based on a claim that performance of the design-build transportation project was delayed or interfered with as a direct result of the utility company's failure to timely perform the utility relocation work; except that damages resulting from delays in the performance of the utility relocation work caused by a force majeure shall not be charged to the utility company; and

The department may withhold issuance of a permit for the location or installation of other facilities to a utility company until the company pays the department damages caused by the company's delay in the performance of the relocation work or interference with the performance of the design-build transportation project by any other contractor. Any person aggrieved by an action of the department in denying a permit may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction for appropriate relief pursuant to the Colorado rules of civil procedure or section 24-4-106, C.R.S.

The department shall provide written notice to any utility company of a design-build transportation project that will require the relocation of the company's facilities as soon as practicable following the environmental clearance for the project. The notice shall include all available and relevant information concerning the project, including the performance schedule for the project within which the utility relocation work must be completed in order to coordinate with and avoid delay in the performance of the project.

When feasible, the department shall provide a replacement easement for a utility company whose facilities are to be relocated from an easement owned by the utility company to accommodate a design-build transportation project, and the department shall condemn the replacement easement when necessary. If no replacement easement is provided, the department shall fund the initial relocation of the easement owner's facilities and shall also fund all future relocations of those utility companies whose facilities occupy the easement at the time of the design-build transportation project at the department's sole expense in lieu of compensating the utility companies for the loss of the easement. The utility company shall quitclaim to the department that portion of the easement that is replaced or extinguished.

Nothing in this section or in section 43-1-1412 shall change the authority, rights, responsibilities, or obligations of the department or of any owner of real or personal property in an eminent domain proceeding or any existing statutory or case law applicable to eminent domain proceedings.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1613, § 3, effective June 1.

43-1-1412. Utility relocation delays.

When a utility company delegates the responsibility for the performance of any utility relocation work necessitated by a design-build transportation project to the department's contractor for the project pursuant to a project specific utility relocation agreement, the utility company shall not be responsible to the department for any damages caused by the delay in the performance of the relocation work or the interference by the department's contractor in the performance of any part of the project by another contractor.

When a utility company chooses to perform any utility relocation work necessitated by a design-build transportation project, the utility company shall complete the relocation work within the time specified in the project specific utility relocation agreement or in the performance schedule for the project as set forth in the written notice provided to the company by the department in accordance with section 43-1-1411 (4). The company shall not interfere with the performance of the design-build transportation project by any other contractor.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 43-1-1411 (3)(b), a utility company shall not be liable for damages caused by the failure to timely perform the relocation work or the interference with the performance of the design-build transportation project by any other contractor when the failure to perform or the interference is caused by a force majeure.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 1615, § 3, effective June 1.